District of Columbia statutes.
47-2886.03

Declaration of policy.

In order to safeguard life, health, and property, and promote the public welfare, the practice of engineering in the District of Columbia is hereby declared to be subject to regulation in the public interest. It is further declared to be a matter of public interest and concern that the profession of engineering merit and receive the confidence of the public and that only qualified persons be permitted to engage in the practice of engineering. All provisions of this part relating to the practice of engineering shall be construed in accordance with this declaration of policy.

History

Sept. 19, 1950, 64 Stat. 855, ch. 953, § 3
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 302, 59 DCR 6190

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-2303.
1973 Ed., § 2-1803.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 19-171 enacted this subchapter into law.